Utah statutes.
30-1-15.   Solemnization of prohibited marriage -- Penalty.

(1) Any person who knowingly, with or without a license, solemnizes a marriage of a minor prohibited by law is guilty of a third degree felony.

(2)  Any person who knowingly, with or without a license, solemnizes a marriage between two adults prohibited by law is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.



Amended by Chapter 129, 2001 General Session

